Utah statutes.
73-20-1.   Purpose of act -- Legislative finding.

It is the purpose of this act to provide financial assistance to commercial farmers and ranchers within the state who own or lease commercial farms or ranches and who are engaged primarily in the production of basic livestock herds in conjunction with such agricultural activity to enable them to provide adequate water supplies for the maintenance and preservation of such herds.

The Legislature finds that drought conditions in the state have resulted in a severe deterioration of range and pasture land which will have a detrimental effect upon the basic livestock industry within the state and upon the people of the state unless financial assistance for the purpose of developing emergency water resources to water basic livestock are made available to those in need.

